Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-402.02
Shoplifters; peace officer; arrest without warrant.

Any peace officer may arrest without warrant any person he has probable cause for believing has committed larceny in retail or wholesale establishments.

Laws 1957, c. 101, § 2, p. 361.